Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-117.02
Disobedience to subpoena; refusal to testify; proceedings for contempt.

In case of disobedience on the part of any person to any subpoena issued by the commission or the refusal of any witness to testify on any matters regarding which he may be lawfully interrogated, it shall be the duty of the district court for the county in which such hearing was convened, on the application of a member of the commission, to compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience to the requirements of a subpoena issued from such court or a refusal to testify therein.

Laws 1959, c. 245, § 3, p. 844.